Utah statutes.
63G-9-304.   Adjustment of claims -- Recommendations to Legislature.

(1)  The board must, at the time designated, proceed to examine and adjust all claims referred to in Section 63G-9-302, and may hear evidence in support of or against them, and shall report to the Legislature the facts and recommendations concerning them as it may think proper.

(2)  In making its recommendations, the board may state and use any official or personal knowledge which any member of the board may have touching such claims.

(3)  The board shall not pass upon or send to the Legislature any claim for which the state or a political subdivision would not otherwise be liable were it not for its sovereign immunity. 

(4)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3), claims wherein the state or a political subdivision would be liable, were it not for its sovereign immunity, whether recommended by the board for approval or disapproval, shall be reported by the board to the Legislature with appropriate findings and recommendations as above provided.

